Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Article 3. Civil Provisions of General Application.

Sec. 25.25.301.
Proceedings under this chapter.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, AS

25.25.301

—

25.25.319

apply to all proceedings under this chapter.

[Repealed, § 32 ch 102 SLA 2015.]

An individual or a support enforcement agency may initiate a proceeding authorized under this chapter by filing a complaint or a comparable pleading in an initiating tribunal for forwarding to a responding tribunal or by filing a complaint or a comparable pleading directly in a tribunal of another state or a foreign country that has or can obtain personal jurisdiction over the respondent.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 52 ch 87 SLA 1997; am §§ 42, 102 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, repealed (b), in (c), substituted “initiate” for “commence” and added “or a foreign country.”

Sec. 25.25.302.
Proceeding by minor parent.

A minor parent, or a guardian or other legal representative of a minor parent, may maintain a proceeding on behalf of or for the benefit of the minor’s child.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995)

Sec. 25.25.303.
Application of law of this state.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a responding tribunal of this state shall

apply the procedural and substantive law generally applicable to similar proceedings originating in this state and may exercise all powers and provide all remedies available in those proceedings; and

determine the duty of support and the amount payable under the law and support guidelines of this state.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 43 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, substituted “in this chapter” for “by this chapter” in the introductory language, deleted “including the rules on choice of law” in (1); made stylistic changes.

Sec. 25.25.304.
Duties of initiating tribunal.

Upon the filing of a complaint or comparable pleading authorized by this chapter, an initiating tribunal of this state shall forward the complaint or comparable pleading and its accompanying documents

to the responding tribunal or appropriate support enforcement agency in the responding state; or

if the identity of the responding tribunal is unknown, to the state information agency of the responding state with a request that they be forwarded to the appropriate tribunal and that receipt be acknowledged.

If requested by the responding tribunal, a tribunal of this state shall issue a certificate or other documents and make findings required by the law of the responding state. If the responding tribunal is in a foreign country, upon request, the tribunal of this state shall specify the amount of support sought, convert the amount into the equivalent amount in the foreign currency under the applicable official or market exchange rate as publicly reported, and provide any other documents necessary to satisfy the requirements of the responding foreign tribunal.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 53 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 44 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, deleted “three copies of” after “state shall forward” in the introductory language of (a), rewrote (b), which read, “If a responding state has not enacted a law or procedure substantially similar to this chapter, a tribunal of this state may issue a certificate or other documents and make findings required by the law of the responding state. If the responding state is a foreign jurisdiction, the tribunal may specify the amount of support sought and provide other documents necessary to satisfy the requirements of the responding state.”

Sec. 25.25.305.
Duties and powers of responding tribunal.

When a responding tribunal of this state receives a complaint or comparable pleading from an initiating tribunal or directly under AS

25.25.301(c)

, it shall cause the complaint or pleading to be filed and notify the petitioner where and when it was filed.

A responding tribunal of this state, to the extent not prohibited by law, may do one or more of the following:

establish or enforce a support order, modify a child support order, determine the controlling child support order, or determine parentage of the child;

order an obligor to comply with a support order, specifying the amount and the manner of compliance;

order income withholding;

determine the amount of any arrearages, and specify a method of payment;

enforce orders by civil or criminal contempt, or both;

set aside property for satisfaction of the support order;

place liens and order execution on the obligor’s property;

order an obligor to keep the tribunal informed of the obligor’s current residential address, electronic mailing address, telephone number, employer, address of employment, and telephone number at the place of employment;

issue a bench warrant for an obligor who has failed after proper notice to appear at a hearing ordered by the tribunal and enter the bench warrant in any local and state computer systems for criminal warrants;

order the obligor to seek appropriate employment by specified methods;

award reasonable attorney fees and other fees and costs; and

grant any other available remedy.

A responding tribunal of this state shall include in a support order issued under this chapter, or in the documents accompanying the order, the calculations on which the support order is based.

A responding tribunal of this state may not condition the payment of a support order issued under this chapter upon compliance by a party with provisions for visitation.

If a responding tribunal of this state issues an order under this chapter, the tribunal shall send a copy of the order to the petitioner and the respondent and to the initiating tribunal, if any.

If requested to enforce a support order, arrears, or judgment or modify a support order stated in a foreign currency, a responding tribunal of this state shall convert the amount stated in the foreign currency to the equivalent amount in dollars under the applicable official or market exchange rate as publicly reported.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am §§ 54, 55 ch 87 SLA 1997; am §§ 45, 46 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (b), substituted “not prohibited” for “otherwise specifically authorized” in the introductory language, rewrote (b)(1), which read, “issue or enforce a support order, modify a child support order, or render a judgment to determine parentage;” added “electronic mailing address” in (b)(8), added (f).

Sec. 25.25.306.
Inappropriate tribunal.

If a complaint or comparable pleading is received by an inappropriate tribunal of this state, the tribunal shall forward the complaint or pleading, and accompanying documents, to an appropriate tribunal in this state or another state and notify the petitioner where and when the complaint or pleading was sent.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 56 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 47 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, substituted “the tribunal shall” for “it shall.”

Sec. 25.25.307.
Duties of child support services agency.

The child support services agency of this state, upon request, shall provide services to a petitioner in a proceeding under this chapter.

In providing services under this chapter to the petitioner, the child support services agency of this state shall

take all steps necessary to enable an appropriate tribunal of this state, another state, or a foreign country to obtain jurisdiction over the respondent;

request an appropriate tribunal to set a date, time, and place for a hearing;

make a reasonable effort to obtain all relevant information, including information as to income and property of the parties;

send notice in a record from an initiating, responding, or registering tribunal to the petitioner within five days after receipt, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays;

send a copy of a communication in a record from the respondent or the respondent’s attorney to the petitioner within five days after receipt, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays; and

notify the petitioner if jurisdiction over the respondent cannot be obtained.

This chapter does not create or negate a relationship of attorney and client or other fiduciary relationship between the child support services agency or the attorney for the agency and the individual being assisted by the agency.

A support enforcement agency of this state that requests registration of a child support order in this state for enforcement or modification shall make reasonable efforts

to ensure that the order to be registered is the controlling order; or

if two or more child support orders exist and the identity of the controlling order has not been determined, to ensure that a request for the determination is made in a tribunal having jurisdiction to do so.

A support enforcement agency of this state that requests registration and enforcement of a support order, arrears, or judgment stated in a foreign currency shall convert the amounts stated in the foreign currency into the equivalent amounts in dollars under the applicable official or market exchange rate as publicly reported.

A support enforcement agency of this state shall issue or request a tribunal of this state to issue a child support order and an income withholding order that redirect payment of current support, arrears, and interest if requested to do so by a support enforcement agency of another state under AS

25.25.319

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 57 ch 87 SLA 1997; am §§ 48, 49 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency” was changed to “child support services agency” in this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (b), substituted “agency of this state shall” for “agency shall, as appropriate,” in the introductory language, substituted “of this state, another state, or a foreign country” for “in this state or another state” in (b)(1), substituted “send notice in a record” for “send written notice” and “five days after receipt” for “two days of receipt” in (b)(4), substituted “send a copy of a communication in a record” for “send a copy of a written communication” and “five days after receipt” for “two days of receipt” in (b)(5); added (d).

Sec. 25.25.308.
Duty of the Department of Revenue.

If the Department of Revenue determines that the support enforcement agency is neglecting or refusing to provide services to an individual, the Department of Revenue may order the agency to perform its duties under this chapter or may provide those services directly to the individual.

The Department of Revenue may determine that a foreign country has established a reciprocal arrangement for child support with this state and take appropriate action for notification of the determination.

History.

(§ 50 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effective dates. —

Section 107, ch. 32, SLA 2015 makes this section effective July 1, 2015.

Sec. 25.25.309.
Private counsel.

An individual may employ private counsel to represent the individual in proceedings authorized by this chapter.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995)

Sec. 25.25.310.
Duties of state information and locator agency.

The child support services agency is the state information agency under this chapter, and it shall

compile and maintain a current list, including addresses, of the tribunals in this state that have jurisdiction under this chapter and the appropriate agency offices in this state and transmit a copy to the state information agency of every other state;

maintain a register of the names and addresses of tribunals and support enforcement agencies received from other states;

forward to the appropriate tribunal in this state all documents concerning a proceeding under this chapter received from another state or a foreign country; and

obtain information concerning the location of the obligor and the obligor’s property within this state that is not exempt from execution by postal verification and federal or state locator services, examination of telephone directories, requests for the obligor’s address from employers, and examination of governmental records, including, to the extent not prohibited by other law, those relating to real property, vital statistics, law enforcement, taxation, motor vehicles, driver’s licenses, and social security.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 58 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 51 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency” was changed to “child support services agency” in this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, added “the names and addresses of” in (2); substituted “another state or a foreign country” for an initiating tribunal or the state information agency of the initiating state” in (3).

Sec. 25.25.311.
Pleadings and accompanying documents.

In a proceeding under this chapter, a petitioner seeking to establish a support order to determine parentage of a child or to register and modify a support order of a tribunal of another state or a foreign country shall file a complaint or comparable pleading. Unless otherwise ordered under AS

25.25.312

, or otherwise prohibited by law, the complaint or comparable pleading or accompanying documents must provide, so far as known, the name, residential address, and social security numbers of the obligor and the obligee or the parent and the alleged parent, and the name, sex, residential address, social security number, and date of birth of each child for whose benefit support is sought or whose parentage is to be determined. Unless filed at the time of registration, the complaint or comparable pleading must be accompanied by a copy of any support order known to have been issued by another tribunal. The complaint or comparable pleading may include other information that may assist in locating or identifying the respondent.

The complaint or comparable pleading must specify the relief sought. The complaint or comparable pleading and accompanying documents must conform substantially with the requirements imposed by the forms mandated by federal law for use in cases filed by a support enforcement agency.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 52 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, rewrote (a), which read, “A petitioner seeking to establish or modify a support order or to determine parentage in a proceeding under this chapter shall verify the complaint or comparable pleading. Unless otherwise ordered under AS

25.25.312

, or otherwise prohibited by law, the complaint or comparable pleading or accompanying documents must provide, so far as known, the name, residential address, and social security numbers of the obligor and the obligee, and the name, sex, residential address, social security number, and date of birth of each child for whom support is sought. The complaint or comparable pleading must be accompanied by a certified copy of any support order in effect. The complaint or comparable pleading may include other information that may assist in locating or identifying the respondent.”

Sec. 25.25.312.
Nondisclosure of information in exceptional circumstances.

If a party alleges in an affidavit or a pleading under oath that the health, safety, or liberty of a party or child would be jeopardized by disclosure of specific identifying information, that information must be sealed and may not be disclosed to the other party or the public. After a hearing in which a tribunal takes into consideration the health, safety, or liberty of the party or child, the tribunal may order disclosure of information that the tribunal determines to be in the interest of justice.

History.

(§ 53 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, repealed and reenacted the section.

Sec. 25.25.313.
Costs and fees.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including a rule of the Alaska Supreme Court, at the time a complaint or comparable pleading is filed under this chapter, a tribunal may not require the petitioner to pay a filing fee or other costs.

If an obligee prevails, a responding tribunal of this state may assess against an obligor filing fees, including fees that were waived under (a) of this section, reasonable attorney fees, other costs, necessary travel expenses, and other reasonable expenses incurred by the obligee and the obligee’s witnesses. The tribunal may not assess fees, costs, or expenses against the obligee or the support enforcement agency of either the initiating or the responding state or foreign country except as required by other law or court rule. Attorney fees may be taxed as costs, and may be ordered paid directly to the attorney, who may enforce the order in the attorney’s own name. Payment of support owed to the obligee has priority over fees, costs, and expenses assessed under this subsection.

The tribunal shall order the payment of costs and reasonable attorney fees, including filing fees that were waived under (a) of this section, by a party who requests a hearing under this chapter if it determines that the hearing was requested primarily for delay. In a proceeding under AS

25.25.601

—

25.25.612

, a hearing is presumed to have been requested primarily for delay if a registered support order is confirmed or enforced without change; however, the party who requested the hearing may present evidence to rebut this presumption.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 54 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Cross references. —

For effect of this section on Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure 79 and 82, see § 22, ch. 57, SLA 1995 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, added “of this state” and “or foreign country” in (b).

Collateral references. —

Entitlement to attorney’s fees under Uniform Parentage Act of 1973, 72 ALR6th 413.

Sec. 25.25.314.
Limited immunity of petitioner.

Participation by a petitioner in a proceeding under this chapter before a responding tribunal, whether in person, by private attorney, or through services provided by the support enforcement agency, does not confer personal jurisdiction over the petitioner in another proceeding.

A petitioner is not amenable to service of civil process while physically present in this state to participate in a proceeding under this chapter.

The immunity granted by this section does not extend to civil litigation based on acts unrelated to a proceeding under this chapter committed by a party while present in this state to participate in the proceeding.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 55 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, added “under this chapter” in (a).

Sec. 25.25.315.
Nonparentage as defense.

A party whose parentage of a child has been previously determined under law may not plead nonparentage as a defense to a proceeding under this chapter.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995)

Administrative Code. —

For administrative actions under the uniform interstate family support act, see 15 AAC 125, art. 9.

Sec. 25.25.316.
Special rules of evidence and procedure.

The physical presence of a nonresident party who is an individual in a tribunal of this state is not required for the establishment, enforcement, or modification of a support order or the rendition of a judgment determining parentage of a child.

An affidavit, a document substantially complying with federally mandated forms, or a document incorporated by reference in any of them, which would not be excluded under the hearsay rule if given in person, is admissible in evidence if given under penalty of perjury by a party or witness residing outside this state.

A copy of the record of child support payments certified as a true copy of the original by the custodian of the record may be forwarded to a responding tribunal. The copy is evidence of facts asserted in it and is admissible to show whether payments were made.

Copies of bills for testing for parentage of a child, and for prenatal and postnatal health care of the mother and child, furnished to the adverse party at least 10 days before trial or other proceeding, are admissible in evidence to prove the amount of the charges billed and that the charges were reasonable, necessary, and customary.

Documentary evidence transmitted from outside this state to a tribunal of this state by telephone, facsimile, or other electronic means that do not provide an original record may not be excluded from evidence on an objection based on the means of transmission.

In a proceeding under this chapter, a tribunal of this state shall permit a party or witness residing outside this state to be deposed or to testify under penalty of perjury by telephone, audiovisual means, or other electronic means at a designated tribunal or other location. A tribunal of this state shall cooperate with other tribunals in designating an appropriate location for the deposition or testimony.

If a party called to testify at a civil hearing refuses to answer on the ground that the testimony may be self-incriminating, the trier of fact may draw an adverse inference from the refusal.

A privilege against disclosure of communications between spouses does not apply in a proceeding under this chapter.

The defense of immunity based on the relationship of husband and wife or parent and child does not apply in a proceeding under this chapter.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am §§ 56 — 61 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (a), substituted “a nonresident party who is an individual in a tribunal” for “the petitioner in a responding tribunal”, added “of a child” at the end; rewrote (b), which read, “A verified complaint or comparable pleading, affidavit, document substantially complying with federally mandated forms, and a document incorporated by reference in any of them, not excluded under the hearsay rule if given in person, is admissible in evidence if given under oath by a party or witness residing in another state.”; in (d), inserted “of a child” following “testing for parentage”; rewrote (e), which read, “Documentary evidence transmitted from another state to a tribunal of this state by telephone, telecopier, or other means that do not provide an original writing may not be excluded from evidence on an objection based on the means of transmission.”; in (f), inserted “under penalty of perjury” following “deposed to testify”, and made stylistic changes; added (j).

Sec. 25.25.317.
Communications between tribunals.

A tribunal of this state may communicate with a tribunal outside this state in a record, or by telephone, electronic mail, or other means, to obtain information concerning the laws, the legal effect of a judgment, decree, or order of that tribunal, and the status of a proceeding. A tribunal of this state may furnish similar information by similar means to a tribunal outside this state.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 62 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, inserted “, electronic mail” following “by telephone” and made stylistic changes.

Sec. 25.25.318.
Assistance with discovery.

A tribunal of this state may

request a tribunal outside this state to assist in obtaining discovery; and

upon request, compel a person over which it has jurisdiction to respond to a discovery order issued by a tribunal outside this state.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 63 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Sec. 25.25.319.
Receipt and disbursement of payments.

The child support services agency of this state shall disburse promptly any amounts received under a support order, as directed by the order. The agency shall furnish to a requesting party or tribunal of another state or a foreign country a certified statement by the custodian of the record of the amounts and dates of all payments received.

If neither the obligor, nor the obligee who is an individual, nor the child resides in this state, upon request from the support enforcement agency of this state or another state, the support enforcement agency of this state or a tribunal of this state shall

direct that the support payment be made to the support enforcement agency of the state in which the obligee is receiving services; and

issue and send to the obligor’s employer a conforming income withholding order or an administrative notice of change of payee, reflecting the redirected payments.

The support enforcement agency of this state receiving redirected payments from another state under a law similar to (b) of this section shall furnish to a requesting party or tribunal of the other state a certified statement by the custodian of the record of the amount and dates of all payments received.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am §§ 64, 65 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency” was changed to “child support services agency” in this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, added “or a foreign country” in (a), added (b) and (c).